Utah statutes.
71-8-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Council" means the Veterans' Advisory Council.

(2)  "Department" means the Department of Veterans' Affairs.

(3)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of Veterans' Affairs.

(4)  "Government entity" means the state and any county, municipality, local district, special service district, and any other political subdivision or administrative unit of the state, including state institutions of education.

(5)  "Veteran" means:

(a)  an individual who has served on active duty in the armed forces for at least 180 consecutive days or was a member of a reserve component, and who has been separated or retired under honorable conditions; or

(b)  any individual incurring an actual service-related injury or disability in the line of duty whether or not that person completed 180 days of active duty.

